Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4837
Special claims.

(1) The claim of a third party which is contingent only on his or her first obtaining a judgment against the insured shall be considered and allowed as if there were no such contingency.

(2) A claim may be allowed even if contingent if it is filed in accordance with section 44-4835. It may be allowed and may participate in all distributions declared after it is filed to the extent that it does not prejudice the orderly administration of the liquidation.

(3) Claims that are due except for the passage of time shall be treated as absolute claims are treated, except that such claims may be discounted at the legal rate of interest.

(4) Claims made under employment contracts by directors, principal officers, or persons in fact performing similar functions or having similar powers shall be limited to payment for services rendered prior to the issuance of any order of rehabilitation or liquidation under section 44-4813 or 44-4818.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 37.